California statutes. Education Code
(C) (i) For each type of credential specified in subparagraph (A), the number and percentage of the students identified
 pursuant to subparagraph (A) who borrowed at any time while enrolled at the institution through a federal student loan program, including, but not necessarily limited to, federal Perkins loans, federal Stafford subsidized and unsubsidized loans, federal direct student loans, and federal family education loans, but excluding institutional loans, state loans, and private loans.

(ii) The total principal borrowed for each type of credential in those loans described in clause (i).

(D) The average cumulative principal borrowed by those students counted for purposes of the calculations required by subparagraphs (B) and (C) by credential type, calculated by dividing the sum identified in clause (ii) of each of those subparagraphs for each type of credential by the number of that type of credential issued for students receiving the loans described in the respective subparagraph.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “loans” shall include cosigned loans that financed a student’s own enrollment or attendance, but shall not include parental loans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.   (AB 721)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

69800.2.

(a) Before certifying a borrower’s eligibility for a private student loan, a public, private, or independent postsecondary educational institution shall provide to the student information concerning all unused state and federal financial assistance, including unused federal student loan moneys available to that student.

(b) An institution that does not participate in federal student loan programs shall inform students that the institution does not participate in federal loan programs and that students may be eligible for federal loans at a participating institution. The institution shall provide the student with information regarding the Cal Grants Web link on the California Student Aid Commission’s Internet Web site and the Federal Student Aid Web link on the
 United States Department of Education’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 70.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

69800.5.

The California Community Colleges may, and are requested to, comply with the provisions of Section 69800.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 632, Sec. 3.   (AB 721)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

69801.

This article shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California act, by resolution, to make it applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 623, Sec. 1.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Forfeiture of State Aid to Students [69810. - 69813.]

69810.

In accepting a scholarship, loan, fellowship, grant-in-aid, or any other financial aid given or guaranteed by the state for assistance, every recipient thereof who is a student at a public or private university, college, or other institution of higher education, shall be deemed to have agreed to observe the rules and regulations promulgated by the
 governing authority of the university, college, or other institution of higher education, for the government thereof.

Any recipient of this state financial aid who, on the campus of the university, college, or other institution of higher education, willfully and knowingly commits any act likely to disrupt the peaceful conduct of the activities of the campus, and is arrested and convicted of a public offense arising from the act, may be determined to be ineligible for any state financial aid for a period not to exceed the ensuing two academic years.

Any recipient of this state financial aid who, after a hearing, is found to have willfully and knowingly disrupted the orderly operation of the campus, but has not been arrested and convicted, may be determined to be ineligible for any state financial aid for the period as the hearing board may determine, not to exceed the ensuing two academic years.

Any recipient who is suspended from an institution of higher education for these acts shall be ineligible for state financial aid for a period not less than the time of the suspension.

The governing authority of the university, college, or other institution of higher education shall, for purposes of this section, cause to be reviewed the record of each recipient and shall, as soon as practicable, notify a hearing board established by it of the name of any recipient who committed any act likely to disrupt the peaceful conduct of the activities of the campus and was arrested and convicted of any public offense arising from that act, or is found to have willfully and knowingly disrupted the orderly operation of the campus, or has been suspended from an institution of higher education for these acts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 678, Sec. 1.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Stats. 1987, Ch. 678, Sec. 4.   Note: Pursuant to Sec. 4 of Ch. 678, this section, in its previous form, was inoperative from Jan. 1, 1988, until Jan. 1, 1993, when it resumed operation in this amended form.)
-------------------------------------------

69811.

Upon receipt of notice, as provided in Section 69810 that any recipient has committed any act likely to disrupt the peaceful conduct of the activities of the campus and was convicted of a public offense in connection therewith, or is found to have willfully and knowingly disrupted the orderly operation of the campus, or has been suspended from an
 institution of higher education for these acts, the hearing board shall immediately give the recipient written notice of the report. The notice shall inform the recipient of the pendency of the proceedings for the suspension of assistance. It shall inform the recipient that he may present evidence of mitigating circumstances to the hearing board within 14 calendar days of the date of the mailing of the notice, and shall specify the procedures and means by which such evidence is to be presented, including the date at which any hearing to be afforded him is to be held. The hearing board may prescribe any procedures and means for these purposes which it may deem appropriate, provided that any hearing which may be afforded the recipient shall not be held sooner than seven days after the date of the mailing of the notice.

If no response to the hearing board’s notice is made within the period specified in this section, the hearing board may suspend further assistance to
 the recipient and the suspension shall remain in effect not to exceed the ensuing two academic years.

After the conclusion of proceedings provided for in this section, the hearing board shall, by majority vote, determine whether further assistance to the recipient shall be suspended. If the recipient was arrested and convicted of a public offense arising from campus disruption, the suspension may remain in effect for a period not to exceed the ensuing two academic years. If the recipient is found by the hearing board to have willfully and knowingly disrupted the orderly operation of the campus, but has not been arrested and convicted, the hearing board may suspend further assistance to the recipient for the period as the hearing board may determine not to exceed the ensuing two academic years. If the recipient was suspended from an institution of higher education for these acts, the hearing board shall suspend further assistance to the recipient for a period not
 less than the time of the suspension. The findings of the hearing board shall be in writing.

The hearing board shall notify the appropriate state agencies of any suspension of state financial aid pursuant to this section, and no state financial aid shall be extended to the recipient during this period.

Any notice required to be made by this section shall be sufficient when it is deposited in the United States registered or certified mail, postage paid, addressed to the last known address of the addressee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Stats. 1987, Ch. 678, Sec. 4.   Note: Pursuant to Sec. 4 of Ch. 678, this section, in its previous form, was inoperative from Jan. 1, 1988, until Jan. 1, 1993, when it resumed operation in this amended form.)
-------------------------------------------

69812.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit any public or private university, college, or other institution of higher education from suspending or refusing to grant scholarships, loans, fellowships, grants-in-aid, or any other financial aid given or guaranteed by the state for academic assistance to any individual because of any other misconduct that in its judgment bears adversely on his or her fitness for the assistance.

(History: Amended (as to be amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 678) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1113, Sec. 40.3.   Amendments operative January 1, 1993, pursuant to Stats. 1987, Ch. 678, Sec. 4.    Note: Sec. 4 of Ch. 678 made this section inoperative from January 1, 1988, until January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

69813.

For the purposes of this article, “state financial aid” means any assistance given or guaranteed by the state that is predicated on attendance at an institution of higher education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1113, Sec. 40.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. College Access Tax Credit Awards [69840. - 69840.]

69840.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) “Fund” means the College Access Tax Credit Fund established pursuant to Section 17053.87 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) “HBCUs” means the colleges and universities listed as “Historically Black Colleges and Universities” by the National Center for Education Statistics.

(4) “Participating students” means students who have completed the associate degree for transfer
 pathway, are enrolled at a partnered HBCU, and qualify to receive an award pursuant to this section.

(5) “Partnered HBCUs” means HBCUs that satisfy all of the following:

(A) Have associate degree for transfer memoranda of understanding on file with the chancellor’s office.

(B) Satisfy subparagraphs (C) and (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7.

(C) Are regionally accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of
 Education.

(6) “Postsecondary costs” means any costs of attendance of participating students at partnered HBCUs.

(b) The moneys allocated to the commission pursuant to Section 17053.87 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be available for the purpose of making awards for participating students pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) Commencing with the 2024–25 award year, the commission may make disbursements of awards from the moneys allocated to the commission directly to partnered HBCUs for postsecondary costs of their participating students.

(2) A participating student may only receive one award pursuant to this section in an amount that does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), as determined by the
 commission based on the availability of moneys allocated to the commission and the financial need of the student.

(3) In making awards pursuant to this section, the commission shall give priority to students with the greatest unmet financial need, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9, who do not exceed the maximum household income and asset level for an applicant for a Cal Grant B award, as set forth in Section 69432.7.

(4) An award under this section is payable only to the extent that moneys are available from the fund. The commission shall inform each recipient of an award under this section that the award is a one-time grant.

(5) A participating student shall file a statement of intent form stating that the student will enroll at a partnered HBCU and return to California after graduation from a
 partnered HBCU.

(d) The commission may make disbursements in any fiscal year in which it determines there are sufficient funds. If the commission determines it would be in the best interest of the program, the commission may roll over moneys allocated to the commission for disbursement in future fiscal years.

(e) If, after making awards pursuant to subdivision (c), moneys remain in the fund, those moneys shall remain in the fund for allocation in future fiscal years.

(f) The commission may adopt regulations for purposes of implementing and administering this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 278, Sec. 3.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Federal Workforce Pell Grant Program [69870. - 69876.]

69870.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(b) “Participating institution” means a federal Workforce Pell Grant-eligible postsecondary educational institution that offers a short-term program and enrolls students living in the state in a short-term program.

(c) “Postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges, a private postsecondary educational institution defined in Section 94858, or an independent institution of higher education defined in Section
 66010.

(d) “Short-term program” means an educational program offered by a participating institution that includes 150 to 599, inclusive, hours of instruction, or an equivalent number of credit hours, over 8 to 14 weeks, inclusive.

(e) “Workforce Pell Grant program” means the federal program established pursuant to Public Law 119-21, under which federal Workforce Pell Grants may be awarded to students enrolled in a short-term program at a participating institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69871.

The Employment Development Department shall provide a list of high-skill, high-wage, or in-demand industry sectors or occupations to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency every two years concurrent with the development and modification of the state plan required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128). The first list shall be submitted on or before October 1, 2026. To fulfill this requirement, the Employment Development Department may use the list updated on or before July 1, 2026, as required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act. After providing the list to the California Workforce Development Board at a meeting of the board, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency shall promptly provide the list to the commission for its consideration in determining whether to
 approve a short-term program pursuant to this article. The commission shall also publicly post this list on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69872.

(a) The commission, on behalf of the Governor, shall determine whether a participating institution’s short-term program meets the requirements established pursuant to this article and shall consult with the California Workforce Development Board on the process that will be used to make those determinations.

(b) Before approving any short-term program pursuant to this article, the commission shall consult with the California Workforce Development Board and the Labor and Workforce Development Agency on the short-term programs that the commission is proposing to approve, which may include, but not be limited to, presenting at a meeting of the California Workforce Development Board a list of short-term programs that the commission is proposing
 to approve.

(c) (1) A participating institution seeking a determination that one or more of its short-term programs meets the requirements of the Workforce Pell Grant program shall provide all of the following to the commission in a manner prescribed by the commission:

(A) Documentation that the short-term program meets all requirements set forth in Section 83002(b) of Public Law 119-21 and any applicable federal or state law or regulation.

(B) Documentation that demonstrates the methodology and implementation plan for maintaining ongoing compliance with all requirements set forth in Section 83002(b) of Public Law 119-21, including a description of how and what data will be collected to demonstrate ongoing compliance.

(C) A
 completed Workforce Pell Grant program application, as developed by the commission, and any associated documentation, data, and certifications that are required as part of its submission in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 69873.

(D) Documentation that the short-term program does all of the following:

(i) Provides an education aligned with the requirements needed for work in the sectors or occupations identified pursuant to Section 69871, including identifying the specific sector or occupation on the list the program aligns with.

(ii) Meets the hiring requirements of employers in the sectors or occupations identified pursuant to Section 69871.

(iii) Leads to a recognized postsecondary credential that is stackable
 and portable across more than one employer or prepares students enrolled in the short-term program for employment in an occupation for which there is only one recognized postsecondary credential and that awards students the credential upon completion of the short-term program.

(iv) Prepares students to pursue one or more certificates or degrees at a postsecondary educational institution by ensuring that, upon completion of the short-term program and enrollment in a related certificate or degree program, a student will receive academic credit that an institution will accept toward that certificate or degree and the academic credit will be accepted toward meeting the certificate or degree program requirements.

(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the
 President of the University of California is requested to, coordinate the submission of applications seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility for the institutions under their authority rather than the institutions separately submitting applications directly to the commission. This coordination is intended to improve efficiency in the submission and processing of applications and to eliminate duplicative submissions. All other submissions shall be made directly to the commission.

(d) (1) A participating institution seeking a determination that one or more of its short-term programs meets the requirements of the Workforce Pell Grant program shall collect all of the following data:

(A) Program-level data, including all of the following:

(i) The name of the short-term program.

(ii) The Classification of Instructional Programs code and title.

(iii) The total number of students that enrolled in the short-term program during the previously completed federal financial aid award year, the students’ state of residence for financial aid purposes, and the number of those students that completed the short-term program.

(iv) The total cost of attendance, including tuition and fees, and the average cost of the short-term program.

(v) The median earnings and percentage of graduates who are employed.

(vi) The number of students who completed the short-term program that are employed in a position related to the short-term program and a list of the positions and employers that
 are considered to be in the program’s field of study, if available. To the extent that the list would result in individual students becoming readily identifiable, that information shall be treated similarly to student-level data and confidential data pursuant to subparagraph (C).

(B) Student-level data necessary for participating institutions to perform calculations demonstrating a program meets federal and state Workforce Pell Grant program requirements, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(i) Demographic information, including, but not limited to, student identifiers, names, and dates of birth.

(ii) Financial aid information, including, but not limited to, aid amounts, including federal, state, and institutional aid, Pell Grant recipient status, net cost, tuition, and fees.

(C) Program-level and student-level data shall be used by participating institutions seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility to demonstrate that they meet all state and federal requirements. To protect student privacy, participating institutions seeking eligibility shall provide to the commission only program-level data and calculations performed using student-level data. Individual student-level data and any confidential data may only be shared with the commission if it is deidentified by the participating institution and critical to demonstrating Workforce Pell Grant program initial or continued eligibility.

(D) Participating institutions shall continue to collect program-level and student-level data necessary to demonstrate initial and continued eligibility to ensure the institutions are able to provide sufficient evidence, upon request of the federal government, that
 they meet federal program performance, outcome, and other requirements. To the extent that such data is needed by the commission to verify continued Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility, the data-sharing limitations described subparagraph (C) shall apply.

(2) (A) (i) Participating institutions shall use data available under the authority provided in Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code to demonstrate compliance with federal and state Workforce Pell Grant program requirements. To the extent necessary to carry out the activities described in this section, data agreements executed under the authority provided in Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may be modified to include data necessary to determine Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility.

(ii) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and
 the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, coordinate data sharing with the Employment Development Department on behalf of the participating institutions under their authority using data available pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(iii) The entities in clause (ii) may amend data-sharing agreements executed under the authority provided in Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code with the Employment Development Department to allow for the redisclosure of data to the participating institutions under their authority to enable them to demonstrate initial or continued eligibility by meeting all federal and state requirements.

(B) (i) Participating institutions interested in seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility
 without existing data-sharing agreements with the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code to demonstrate compliance with federal and state Workforce Pell Grant program requirements shall submit a letter of interest to the commission and the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data on or before December 15, 2026, and on or before December 15 of each year thereafter, to the extent that legislation described in clause (iii) has not yet been enacted, expressing their interest in seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility. The letter of intent shall indicate the number and name of the programs seeking eligibility, the specific sector or occupation on the list prepared pursuant to Section 69871 each program aligns with, and the average class size for each program.

(ii) To the extent letters of interest are submitted, the commission and the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data shall jointly submit a report
 to the Department of Finance and the Legislature summarizing those letters. The report may also include a recommended plan for how data equivalent to the data described under Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may be provided to participating institutions seeking data to demonstrate initial or continued Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility by meeting all federal and state requirements. The commission and the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data may consult with the Employment Development Department if a recommended plan is developed. This report shall be submitted to the Department of Finance and the Legislature pursuant to Government Code Section 9795.

(iii) Applications seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility from participating institutions without existing data-sharing agreements with the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may not be accepted before the adoption
 of legislation specifying the process by which data equivalent to the data described under Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code shall be provided to participating institutions seeking Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility.

(e) The commission shall not authorize a participating institution to receive Workforce Pell Grant program funds for a short-term program unless all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The commission determines that the short-term program meets the requirements set forth in Section 83002(b) of Public Law 119-21, and as implemented through any applicable federal or state law or regulation.

(2) The participating institution has met the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d).

(3) The participating institution
 is accredited by an agency that is recognized and approved by the United States Department of Education and that reviews and provides accreditation for short-term programs.

(4) The short-term program has been offered by the participating institution for at least one year before the date that the participating institution submitted its request for an eligibility determination pursuant to this article.

(f) (1) The commission shall make a determination on the approval of a participating institution’s eligibility for the Workforce Pell Grant program and provide written notice of its decision, including any reasons for disapproval, within 90 days of receiving the participating institution’s application for an eligibility determination and completed participation agreement.

(2) (A) (i) The commission shall establish an appeal process for an otherwise qualifying institution that fails to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (c) or (d), or both, for participation in the Workforce Pell Grant program.

(ii) The commission shall only consider an appeal on the basis of a technical error in the reporting of data required for an eligibility determination for participation in the Workforce Pell Grant program pursuant to subdivision (c).

(B) The commission shall respond to an appellant within 60 days of receiving the appeal and all associated documentation, including any updated data, that is relevant to the appeal. The commission may request additional information from the institution as necessary to complete its review of the appeal. The 60-day deadline may be extended upon agreement of the commission and the appellant, or
 upon a demonstration of good cause by the commission.

(g) The commission shall revoke the approval of a short-term program related to the Workforce Pell Grant program if any of the following occurs:

(1) The participating institution fails to meet the requirements of subdivision (c) or (d) in any award year.

(2) The participating institution is determined by a court or the California State Auditor to have engaged in unlawful, unfair, or fraudulent business acts or practices, including unfair, deceptive, untrue, or misleading statements related to the short-term program.

(3) The participating institution fails to provide data to the Office of Cradle-to-Career data pursuant to Section 69875.

(h) The commission shall publicly notify students enrolled in qualifying short-term programs of their rights as recipients of a Workforce Pell Grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69873.

(a) The commission shall adopt regulations, including any amendments to regulations, necessary to implement the Workforce Pell Grant program.

(b) The commission may adopt emergency regulations it deems necessary to implement the Workforce Pell Grant program, in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of those regulations or amendments to those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general
 welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law and without further compliance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), any emergency regulations and amendments to the emergency regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall remain in force and effect until December 1, 2027, or until the commission adopts permanent regulations pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69874.

(a) (1) The commission shall submit a report to the Department of Finance, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review on or before October 1, 2027, and on or before October 1 of each year thereafter, that lists all institutions seeking an eligibility determination pursuant to this article, the specific short-term programs assessed for eligibility, and the final eligibility determination for each program assessed.

(2) The commission shall distinguish between short-term programs that have received commission approval before review by the United States Department of Education and short-term programs that have received final eligibility decisions from the United States Department
 of Education in the reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) (1) The commission shall present an interim report on or before August 30, 2028, and a final report on or before August 30, 2030, at a meeting of the commission that evaluates the Workforce Pell Grant program and includes the following information:

(A) A list of institutions and programs that the commission has determined as meeting federal and state eligibility requirements for participation in the Workforce Pell Grant program.

(B) An assessment of the amount of Workforce Pell Grant program moneys benefitting California, program completion rates, and job placement rates reported by institution, program type, and year.

(2) The commission shall submit the reports
 described in paragraph (1) to the Department of Finance, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review no later than one week after each report is presented at a meeting of the commission.

(3) The commission may enter into an agreement with the Office of the Cradle-to-Career Data to assist with the preparation of the interim and final reports described in paragraph (1). The Office of Cradle-to-Career shall not provide individual student-level data or confidential data to the commission for the completion of these reports. Any other data shared shall be consistent with applicable federal and state laws regarding access to and confidentiality of student record information, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the
 Civil Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69875.

(a) (1) A participating institution seeking or obtaining Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility shall provide program-level and student-level data required pursuant to Section 69872, and any data or outcome metrics used to justify initial or continued eligibility, to the Office of the Cradle-to-Career Data.

(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, coordinate with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data on behalf of their respective participating institutions to submit the required data to the California Cradle-to-Career Data System using
 existing legal and data-sharing agreements.

(3) A participating institution, excluding an institution covered under paragraph (2), shall provide data in a manner and procedure established by the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data. The manner and procedure, and any related guidance or manuals, outlined by the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data to implement this section shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) (1) A participating institution shall ensure that any confidential student information or student-level data collected for purposes of this article is disclosed to the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data, consistent with applicable federal and state laws regarding access to, and confidentiality of, student record
 information, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(2) Pursuant to Section 10872, information disclosed to the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data is not subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) The Office of Cradle-to-Career Data may publicly disclose any information submitted by a participating institution subject to, and in compliance with, all applicable state and federal privacy law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69876.

(a) In addition to its authority under existing state law, the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data may carry out its duties under the Workforce Pell Grant program.

(b) The Office of Cradle-to-Career Data shall provide the data necessary to carry out its duties under this article to either the participating institutions or the commission, consistent with applicable federal and state laws concerning access to and confidentiality of student record information, to implement the Workforce Pell Grant program. Student level data shall be deidentified to protect student privacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Learning-Aligned Employment Program [69950. - 69969.]

69950.

(a) As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(b) “Program” means the Learning-Aligned Employment Program created pursuant to this article.

(c) “Public postsecondary educational institution” or “institution” means a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 33.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

69951.

The Leaning-Aligned Employment Program is hereby created to provide eligible college and university students with the opportunity to earn money to help defray their educational costs, while gaining education-aligned, career-related
 experience. The program shall be administered by the commission, in consultation with the office of the President of the University of California, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. The Legislature finds that the program furthers the interests of the state, and specifically lessens the burdens of government by ensuring eligible college and university students can pursue higher education in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 34.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

69952.

(a) A postsecondary educational institution currently eligible to participate in state-funded student financial aid programs pursuant to this chapter or in federal financial aid programs is eligible
 and strongly encouraged to participate in the
 program.

(b) Before participating in the program, each institution shall sign an institutional agreement with commission acknowledging its willingness to administer the program pursuant to this article and
 guidance developed by the commission, in consultation with the office of the President of the University of California, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. The agreement shall include the procedures that the institution shall use to ensure that each learning-aligned employment position is related to the student’s area of study or career interests.

(c) Each participating
 public postsecondary educational institution shall be required, as a condition of participation in the program, to comply with such auditing or other fiscal reporting requirements as the commission, in consultation with the office of the President of the University of California, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, may establish. These requirements shall be applied by the
 commission, in consultation with the office of the President of the University of California, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, so as to ensure that no payments received pursuant to this article are applied to the general aid or support of the institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 35.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

69954.

All of the following entities shall be eligible to employ students participating in the program:

(a) Research centers and institutions operated by public postsecondary educational institutions, if their learning-aligned employment opportunities provide participating students with direct opportunities to participate in the research that is undertaken by the respective research centers and institutions.

(b) Public schools operated by school districts, county superintendents of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, or the
 department.
